North Carolina, session 2025, SB130.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 4.2 of the Charter of the City of Hendersonville, being Chapter
874 of the 1971 Session Laws, as amended by S.L. 2016-15, S.L. 2023-44, and S.L. 2023-143,
reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4.2. Method of Municipal Elections. The Mayor and Council Members shall be elected
on a nonpartisan basis and results determined by the plurality method as provided in
G.S. 163-292. The filing period shall be the same as for county officers elected on a partisan
basis."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*S130-v-1*